New Jersey, session 222, S3656.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, sports wagering partnership means a partnership or contractual agreement between a sports wagering operator or intermediary and an institution of higher education, including an athletic department or booster club of the institution, for access to advertise in the institutions stadiums and other facilities, in digital and broadcast sports content, and through other means. b.  An institution of higher education shall not participate in a sports wagering partnership as defined by subsection a. of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.